California statutes. Vehicle Code
(a) (1) An issuing agency that operates an electronic toll collection system that permits payment by a transponder or other electronic toll payment device shall, directly or through a third-party vendor, make the transponder or other electronic toll payment device available for acquisition online, by mail, and in person at a retail outlet, the office of an issuing agency or processing agency, as defined in Section 40253, or customer service center.

(2) At least one retail outlet, kiosk, or customer service center that offers the transponder or other electronic toll payment device associated with the issuing agency shall be located within the jurisdiction of the issuing agency.

(3) The issuing agency shall post on an internet website related to its electronic toll collection system locations where tolls may be paid with cash, and locations at which a transponder or other electronic toll payment device may be acquired.

(b) The price of the transponder or other electronic toll payment device shall not exceed the reasonable cost to the issuing agency based on the estimated cost to procure and distribute the device.

(c) As used in this article, “retail outlet” includes a store managed by the issuing agency, a cash payment location, or other locations not managed by the issuing agency.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 969, Sec. 6.   (AB 2594)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23307.

(a) If an issuing agency offers a transponder or other electronic toll payment device, a person shall be allowed to acquire a transponder or other electronic toll payment device with cash, or with a credit or debit card, and shall be allowed to load a minimum of one hundred dollars ($100) onto the associated account with cash or with a credit or debit card.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of Section 23306, there shall be no additional transaction fee charged to acquire the transponder or other electronic toll payment device.

(c) An issuing agency shall not assess any additional transaction fee to the amount a person is charged by a cash payment network company to
 load funds to an account using cash through a cash payment network.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 969, Sec. 7.   (AB 2594)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23308.

(a) Subject to extenuating circumstances and holidays, the hours during which one of the issuing or processing agency’s offices or customer service centers are open to the public to provide customer service related to electronic toll collection shall include at least five hours per week between the hours of 6 a.m. to 8 a.m. or 5 p.m. to 7 p.m., or on a Saturday.

(b) A person shall be able to conduct all of the following transactions at either the issuing agency’s office or customer service center:

(1) Acquire the issuing agency’s transponder or other electronic toll payment device.

(2) Load money onto an account with
 the issuing agency.

(3) Pay a toll notice, including fines and penalties.

(4) Register or remove a license plate to or from a transponder or other electronic toll payment device account with the issuing agency for payment of tolls.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of Section 23306, the issuing agency shall not charge persons paying cash an additional transaction fee for any transaction listed in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (b) that are conducted at the issuing or processing agency’s office, or customer service center. There shall be at least one issuing or processing agency’s office or customer service center within the issuing agency’s jurisdiction.

(d) The issuing agency shall have two or more physical locations
 within each county in which a toll facility operated by the issuing agency is located for purposes of conducting the transactions set forth in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (b).

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 969, Sec. 8.   (AB 2594)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23309.

(a) Subject to extenuating circumstances and holidays, the issuing agency, directly or through a third-party vendor, shall maintain a customer service telephone line that shall be operated by a live person for at least 35 hours per week between the hours of 8 a.m. to 5 p.m. and an additional 5 hours per week between the hours of 6 a.m. to 8 a.m., from 5 p.m. to 7 p.m., or on a Saturday. The customer service telephone line shall be available to address questions related to acquiring a transponder or other electronic toll payment device, paying toll notices, disputing tolls and penalties, setting up payment plans, and registering the license plate of a vehicle to a transponder or other electronic toll payment device account.

(b) The customer
 service telephone line shall provide language interpreter services and assistance for deaf or hard-of-hearing individuals.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 969, Sec. 9.   (AB 2594)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Special Traffic Regulations [23330. - 23336.]

23330.

Except where a special permit has been obtained from the Department of Transportation under the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 35780) of Chapter 5 of Division 15, none of the following shall be permitted on any vehicular crossing:

(a) Animals while being led or driven, even though tethered or harnessed.

(b) Bicycles, motorized bicycles, or motorized scooters, unless the department by signs indicates that bicycles, motorized bicycles, or motorized scooters, or any combination thereof, are permitted upon all or any portion of the vehicular crossing.

(c) Vehicles having a total width of vehicle or load exceeding 102 inches.

(d) Vehicles carrying items prohibited by regulations promulgated by the Department of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 722, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

23331.

Pedestrians shall not be permitted upon any vehicular crossing, unless unobstructed sidewalks of more than three feet in width are constructed and maintained and signs indicating that pedestrians are permitted are in place.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

23332.

It is unlawful for any person to be upon any portion of a vehicular crossing which is not intended for public use without the permission of the Department of Transportation. This section does not apply to a person engaged in the operation, maintenance, or repair of a vehicular crossing or any facility thereon nor to any person attempting to effect a rescue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

23333.

No vehicle shall stop, stand, or be parked in or upon any vehicular crossing except:

(a) When necessary to avoid injury or damage to persons or property.

(b) When necessary for the repair, maintenance or operation of a publicly owned toll bridge.

(c) In compliance with the direction of a member of the California Highway Patrol or an employee of the Department of Transportation who is a peace officer or with the direction of a sign or signal.

(d) In such places as may be designated by the Director of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

23334.

The Department of Transportation may adopt rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter for the control of traffic on any vehicular crossing to aid and insure the safe and orderly flow of traffic, and shall, so far as practicable, notify the public of the rules and regulations by signs on the vehicular crossing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

23335.

The Department of Transportation shall cause to be published and made available to the public at the tollgates of each vehicular crossing copies of those traffic laws and rules and regulations particularly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

23336.

It is unlawful to violate any rules or regulations adopted under Section 23334, notice of which has been given either by a sign on a vehicular crossing or by publication as provided in Section 23335.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 11.5. SENTENCING FOR DRIVING WHILE UNDER THE INFLUENCE [23500. - 23675.]



CHAPTER 1. Court-Imposed Penalties: Persons Less Than 21 Years Of Age [23500. - 23521.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [23500. - 23500.]

23500.

This chapter applies to the imposition of penalties and sanctions by the courts on persons who were less than 21 years of age at the time of the commission of the driving while under the influence offenses described in Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 23100) of Division 11.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative July 1, 1999, pursuant to Section 23675.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Penalties for a Violation of Section 23140 [23502. - 23502.]

23502.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a person who is at least 18 years of age is convicted of a first violation of Section 23140, in addition to any penalties, the court shall order the person to attend a program licensed under Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, subject to a fee schedule developed under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 11837.4 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) The attendance in a licensed driving-under-the-influence
 program required under subdivision (a) shall be as follows:

(1) If, within 10 years of the current violation of Section 23140, the person has not been convicted of a separate violation of Section 23140, 23152, or 23153, or of Section 23103, with a plea of guilty under Section 23103.5, or of Section 655 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, or of Section 191.5 of, or subdivision (a) of Section 192.5 of, the Penal Code, the person shall complete, at a minimum, the education component of that licensed driving-under-the-influence program.

(2) If the person does not meet the requirements of paragraph (1), the person shall complete, at a minimum, the program described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 11837 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) The person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle shall be suspended by
 the department as required under Section 13352.6, and the court shall require the person to surrender his or her driver’s license to the court in accordance with Section 13550.

(d) The court shall advise the person at the time of sentencing that the driving privilege will not be restored until the person has provided the department with proof satisfactory to the department that the person has successfully completed the driving-under-the-influence program required under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 747, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Youthful Drunk Driver Visitation Program [23509. - 23518.5.]

23509.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Youthful Drunk Driver Visitation Program Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative July 1, 1999, pursuant to Section 23675.)
-------------------------------------------

23510.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Young drivers often do not realize the consequences of drinking alcohol or ingesting any other drugs, whether legal or not, and driving a motor vehicle while their physical capabilities to drive safely are impaired by those substances.

(b) Young drivers who use alcohol or other drugs are likely to become dependent
 on those substances and prompt intervention is needed to protect other persons, as well as the young driver, from death or serious injury.

(c) The conviction of a young driver for driving under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, a drug, or both, identifies that person as a risk to the health and safety of others, as well as that young driver, because of the young driver’s inability to control his or her conduct.

(d) It has been demonstrated that close observation of the effects on others of alcohol and other drugs, both chronic and acute, by a young driver convicted of driving under the influence has a marked effect on recidivism and should therefore be encouraged by the courts, prehospital emergency medical care personnel, and other officials charged with cleaning up the carnage and wreckage caused by drunk drivers.

(e) The program prescribed in this article provides guidelines for the operation of an intensive program to discourage recidivism by convicted young drunk drivers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative July 1, 1999, pursuant to Section 23675.)
-------------------------------------------

23512.

For the purposes of this article, “program” means the Youthful Drunk Driver Visitation Program prescribed in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative July 1, 1999, pursuant to Section 23675.)
-------------------------------------------

23514.

(a) If a person is found to be in violation of Section 23140, is convicted of, or is adjudged a ward of the juvenile court for, a violation of Section 21200.5, 23140, or 23152 punishable under Section 23536, or Section 23220, 23221, or 23222, subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 23224, or Section 23225 or 23226, and is granted probation, the court may order, with the consent of the defendant or ward, as a term and condition of probation in addition to any other term and condition
 required or authorized by law, that the defendant or ward participate in the program.

(b) The court shall give preference for participation in the program to defendants or wards who were less than 21 years of age at the time of the offense if the facilities of the program in the jurisdiction are limited to fewer than the number of defendants or wards eligible and consenting to participate.

(c) The court shall require that the defendant or ward not drink any alcoholic beverage at all before reaching the age of 21 years and not use illegal drugs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative July 1, 1999, pursuant to Section 23675.)
-------------------------------------------

23516.

The court shall investigate and consult with the defendant or ward, defendant’s or ward’s counsel, if any, and any proposed supervisor of a visitation under the program, and the court may consult with any other person whom the court finds may be of value, including, but not limited to, the defendant’s or ward’s parents or other family members, in order to ascertain that the defendant or ward is suitable for the program, that the visitation will be educational and meaningful to the defendant or ward, and
 that there are no physical, emotional, or mental reasons to believe the program would not be appropriate or would cause any injury to the defendant or ward.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative July 1, 1999, pursuant to Section 23675.)
-------------------------------------------

23517.

(a) To the extent that personnel and facilities are made available to the court, the court may include a requirement for supervised visitation by the defendant or ward to all, or any, of the following:

(1) A trauma facility, as defined in Section 1798.160 of the Health and Safety Code, a base hospital designated pursuant to Section 1798.100 or 1798.101 of the Health and Safety Code, or a general acute care hospital having a basic emergency medical services special permit issued pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1277 of the Health and Safety Code that regularly receives victims of vehicle crashes, between the hours of 10 p.m. and 2 a.m.
 on a Friday or Saturday night to observe appropriate victims of vehicle crashes involving drinking drivers, under the supervision of any of the following:

(A) A registered nurse trained in providing emergency trauma care or prehospital advanced life support.

(B) An emergency room physician.

(C) An emergency medical technician-paramedic or an emergency medical technician II. 

(2) If approved by the county coroner, the county coroner’s office or the county morgue to observe appropriate victims of vehicle crashes involving drinking drivers, under the supervision of the coroner or a deputy coroner.

(b) As used in this section, “appropriate victims” means victims whose condition is determined by the visitation supervisor to demonstrate the results of crashes involving drinking drivers without being excessively gruesome or traumatic to the probationer.

(c) If persons trained in counseling or substance abuse are made available to the court, the court may coordinate the visitation program or the visitations at any facility designated in subdivision (a) through those persons.

(d) Any visitation shall include, before any observation of victims or disabled persons by the probationer, a comprehensive counseling session with the visitation supervisor at which the supervisor shall explain and discuss the experiences that may be encountered during the visitation in order
 to ascertain whether the visitation is appropriate for the probationer.

(e) If at any time, whether before or during a visitation, the supervisor of the probationer determines that the visitation may be or is traumatic or otherwise inappropriate for the probationer, or is uncertain whether the visitation may be traumatic or inappropriate, the visitation shall be terminated without prejudice to the probationer.

(f) Prior to the court including a requirement for supervised visitation, pursuant to subdivision (a), the court shall consider the speed of the vehicle, the severity of any injuries sustained as a result of the violation, and whether the defendant or ward was engaged in a speed competition, as defined in Section 23109.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 81, Sec. 5.   (AB 2198)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23518.

(a) The program may include a personal conference after the visitations described in Section 23517 between the sentencing judge or judicial officer or the person responsible for coordinating the program for the judicial district and the probationer, his or her counsel, and, if available, the probationer’s parents to discuss the experiences of the visitation and how those experiences may impact the probationer’s future conduct.

(b) If a personal conference described in subdivision (a) is not practicable, because of the probationer’s absence from the jurisdiction, conflicting time schedules, or other reasons, the program should provide for a written report or letter by the probationer to the court discussing the experiences and their impact on the probationer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative July 1, 1999, pursuant to Section 23675.)
-------------------------------------------

23518.5.

The county, a court, any facility visited pursuant to the program, the agents, employees, or independent contractors of the court, county, or facility visited pursuant to the program, and any person supervising a probationer during the visitation, is not liable for any civil damages resulting from injury to the probationer, or civil damages caused by the probationer, during, or from any activities relating to, the visitation, except for willful or grossly negligent acts intended to, or reasonably
 expected to result in, that injury or damage and except for workers’ compensation for the probationer as prescribed by law if the probationer performs community service at the facility as an additional term or condition of probation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative July 1, 1999, pursuant to Section 23675.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Penalties for a Violation of Section 23152 or 23153 [23520. - 23521.]

23520.

(a) Whenever, in any county specified in subdivision (b), a judge of a juvenile court, a juvenile hearing officer, or referee of a juvenile court finds that a person has committed a first violation of Section 23152 or 23153, the person shall be required to participate in and successfully complete an alcohol or drug education program, or both of those programs, as designated by the court. The expense of the person’s attendance in the program shall be paid by the person’s parents or guardian so long as the person is under the age of 18
 years, and shall be paid by the person thereafter. However, in approving the program, each county shall require the program to provide for the payment of the fee for the program in installments by any person who cannot afford to pay the full fee at the commencement of the program and shall require the program to provide for the waiver of the fee for any person who is indigent, as determined by criteria for indigency established by the board of supervisors. Whenever it can be done without substantial additional cost, each county shall require that the program be provided for juveniles at a separate location from, or at a different time of day than, alcohol and drug education programs for adults.

(b) This section applies only in those counties that have one or more alcohol or drug education programs certified by the county alcohol program administrator and approved by the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

23521.

(a) Any finding of a juvenile court judge, juvenile hearing officer, or referee of a juvenile court of a commission of an offense in any state, territory, possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or the Dominion of Canada that, if committed in this state, would be a violation of Section 23152, is a conviction of a violation of Section 23152 for the purposes of
 Sections 13352, 13352.3, 13352.4, and 13352.5, and the finding of a juvenile court judge, juvenile hearing officer, or referee of a juvenile court of a commission of an offense that, if committed in this state, would be a violation of Section 23153 is a conviction of a violation of Section 23153 for the purposes of Sections 13352 and 13352.3.

(b) This section shall become operative on September 20, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 551, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Amended version operative September 20, 2005, pursuant to earlier operation of new subdivision (b).)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Court Penalties [23530. - 23598.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [23530. - 23530.]

23530.

This chapter applies to the imposition of penalties, sanctions, and probation upon persons convicted of violating driving while under the influence offenses that are set forth in Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 23100) of Division 11.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Section operative July 1, 1999, pursuant to Section 23675.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Penalties for a Violation of Section 23152 [23536. - 23552.]

23536.

(a) If a person is convicted of a first violation of Section 23152, that person shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 96 hours, at least 48 hours of which shall be continuous, nor more than six months, and by a fine of not less than three hundred ninety dollars ($390), nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(b) The court shall order that a person punished under subdivision (a), who is to be punished by imprisonment in the county jail, be
 imprisoned on days other than days of regular employment of the person, as determined by the court. If the court determines that 48 hours of continuous imprisonment would interfere with the person’s work schedule, the court shall allow the person to serve the imprisonment whenever the person is normally scheduled for time off from work. The court may make this determination based upon a representation from the defendant’s attorney or upon an affidavit or testimony from the defendant.

(c) The person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle shall be suspended by the department under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 13352 or Section 13352.1. The court shall require the person to surrender the driver’s license to the court in accordance with Section 13550.

(d) Whenever, when considering the circumstances taken as a whole, the court determines that the person punished under
 this section would present a traffic safety or public safety risk if authorized to operate a motor vehicle during the period of suspension imposed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 13352 or Section 13352.1, the court may disallow the issuance of a restricted driver’s license required under Section 13352.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 692, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

23538.

(a) (1) If the court grants probation to person punished under Section 23536, in addition to the provisions of Section 23600 and any other terms and conditions imposed by the court, the court shall impose as a condition of probation that the person pay a fine of at least three hundred ninety dollars ($390), but not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). The court may also impose,
 as a condition of probation, that the person be confined in a county jail for at least 48 hours, but not more than six months.

(2) The person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle shall be suspended by the department under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 13352 or Section 13352.1. The court shall require the person to surrender the driver’s license to the court in accordance with Section 13550.

(3) Whenever, when considering the circumstances taken as a whole, the court determines that the person punished under this section would present a traffic safety or public safety risk if authorized to operate a motor vehicle during the period of suspension imposed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 13352 or Section 13352.1, the court may disallow the issuance of a restricted driver’s license required under Section 13352.4.

(b) In any county where the board of supervisors has approved, and the State Department of Health Care Services has licensed, a program or programs described in Section 11837.3 of the Health and Safety Code, the court shall also impose as a condition of probation that the driver shall enroll and participate in, and successfully complete a driving-under-the-influence program, licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, in the driver’s county of residence or employment, as designated by the court. For the purposes of this subdivision, enrollment in, participation in, and completion of an approved program shall be subsequent to the date of the current violation. Credit may not be given for any program activities completed prior to the date of the current violation.

(1) The court shall refer a first offender whose blood-alcohol concentration was less than 0.20
 percent, by weight, to participate for at least three months or longer, as ordered by the court, in a licensed program that consists of at least 30 hours of program activities, including those education, group counseling, and individual interview sessions described in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 11836) of Part 2 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The court shall refer a first offender whose blood-alcohol concentration was 0.20 percent or more, by weight, or who refused to take a chemical test, to participate for at least nine months or longer, as ordered by the court, in a licensed program that consists of at least 60 hours of program activities, including those education, group counseling, and individual interview sessions described in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 11836) of Part 2 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) The court shall
 advise the person at the time of sentencing that the driving privilege shall not be restored until proof satisfactory to the department of successful completion of a driving-under-the-influence program of the length required under this code that is licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code has been received in the department’s headquarters.

(c) (1) The court shall revoke the person’s probation pursuant to Section 23602, except for good cause shown, for the failure to enroll in, participate in, or complete a program specified in subdivision (b).

(2) The court, in establishing reporting requirements, shall consult with the county alcohol program administrator. The county alcohol program administrator shall coordinate the reporting requirements with the department and with the State Department of Health Care Services. That reporting shall
 ensure that all persons who, after being ordered to attend and complete a program, may be identified for either (A) failure to enroll in, or failure to successfully complete, the program, or (B) successful completion of the program as ordered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 22, Sec. 87.   (AB 75)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 110 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

23540.

(a) If a person is convicted of a violation of Section 23152 and the offense occurred within 10 years of a separate violation of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, 23152, or 23153, that resulted in a conviction, that person shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 90 days nor more than one year and by a fine of not less than three hundred ninety dollars ($390) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). The person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle shall be
 suspended by the department pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 13352. The court shall require the person to surrender the driver’s license to the court in accordance with Section 13550.

(b) Whenever, when considering the circumstances taken as a whole, the court determines that the person punished under this section would present a traffic safety or public safety risk if authorized to operate a motor vehicle during the period of suspension imposed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 13352, the court may disallow the issuance of a restricted driver’s license required under Section 13352.5.

(c) This section shall become operative on September 20, 2005.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 17.3) and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 551, Sec. 17.5.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative September 20, 2005, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23542.

(a) (1) If the court grants probation to a person punished under Section 23540, in addition to the provisions of Section 23600 and any other terms and conditions imposed by the court, the court shall impose as conditions of probation that the person be confined in county jail and fined under either of the following:

(A) For at least 10 days, but not more than one year, and pay a fine of at least three hundred ninety dollars
 ($390), but not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(B) For at least 96 hours, but not more than one year, and pay a fine of at least three hundred ninety dollars ($390), but not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). A sentence of 96 hours of confinement shall be served in two increments consisting of a continuous 48 hours each. The two 48-hour increments may be served nonconsecutively.

(2) The person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle shall be suspended by the department under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 13352. The court shall require the person to surrender the driver’s license to the court in accordance with Section 13550.

(b) In addition to the conditions specified in subdivision (a), the court shall require the person to do either of the following:

(1) Enroll and participate, for at least 18 months subsequent to the date of the underlying violation and in a manner satisfactory to the court, in a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, as designated by the court. The person shall complete the entire program subsequent to, and shall not be given any credit for any program activities completed prior to, the date of the current violation. The program shall provide for persons who cannot afford the program fee pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 11837.4 of the Health and Safety Code in order to enable those persons to participate.

(2) Enroll and participate, for at least 30 months subsequent to the date of the underlying violation and in a manner satisfactory to the court, in a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of
 the Health and Safety Code. The person shall complete the entire program subsequent to, and shall not be given any credit for any program activities completed prior to, the date of the current violation.

(c) The court shall advise the person at the time of sentencing that the driving privilege shall not be restored until proof satisfactory to the Department of Motor Vehicles of successful completion of a driving-under-the-influence program of the length required under this code licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code has been received in the department’s headquarters.

(d) Whenever, when considering the circumstances taken as a whole, the court determines that the person punished under this section would present a traffic safety or public safety risk if authorized to operate a motor vehicle during the period of suspension imposed under paragraph (3) of
 subdivision (a) of Section 13352, the court may disallow the issuance of a restricted driver’s license required under Section 13352.5.

(e) This section shall become operative on September 20, 2005.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 18.3) and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 551, Sec. 18.5.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative September 20, 2005, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23546.

(a) If a person is convicted of a violation of Section 23152 and the offense occurred within 10 years of two separate violations of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5, 23152, or 23153, or any combination thereof, that resulted in convictions, that person shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 120 days nor more than one year and by a fine of not less than three hundred ninety dollars ($390) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). The person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle shall be
 revoked by the Department of Motor Vehicles as required in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 13352. The court shall require the person to surrender his or her driver’s license to the court in accordance with Section 13550.

(b) A person convicted of a violation of Section 23152 punishable under this section shall be designated as a habitual traffic offender for a period of three years, subsequent to the conviction. The person shall be advised of this designation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13350.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 550, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

23548.

(a) (1) If the court grants probation to any person punished under Section 23546, in addition to the provisions of Section 23600 and any other terms and conditions imposed by the court, the court shall impose as conditions of probation that the person be confined in the county jail for at least 120 days but not more than one year and pay a fine of at least three hundred ninety dollars ($390) but
 not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) The person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle shall be revoked by the department under paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 13352. The court shall require the person to surrender the driver’s license to the court in accordance with Section 13550.

(b) In addition to subdivision (a), if the court grants probation to any person punished under Section 23546, the court may order as a condition of probation that the person participate, for at least 30 months subsequent to the underlying conviction and in a manner satisfactory to the court, in a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code. In lieu of the minimum term of imprisonment specified in subdivision (a), the court shall impose as a condition of probation under this subdivision that the person be confined in the
 county jail for at least 30 days but not more than one year. The court shall not order the treatment prescribed by this subdivision unless the person makes a specific request and shows good cause for the order, whether or not the person has previously completed a treatment program pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 23542 or paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 23562. In order to enable all required persons to participate, each person shall pay the program costs commensurate with the person’s ability to pay as determined pursuant to Section 11837.4 of the Health and Safety Code. No condition of probation required pursuant to this subdivision is a basis for reducing any other probation requirement in this section or Section 23600 or for avoiding the mandatory license revocation provisions of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 13352.

(c) In addition to the provisions of Section 23600 and subdivision (a), if the
 court grants probation to any person punished under Section 23546 who has not previously completed a treatment program pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 23542 or paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 23562, and unless the person is ordered to participate in and complete a driving-under-the-influence program under subdivision (b), the court shall impose as a condition of probation that the person, subsequent to the date of the current violation, enroll and participate, for at least 18 months and in a manner satisfactory to the court, in a driving-under-the-influence program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code, as designated by the court. The person shall complete the entire program subsequent to, and shall not be given any credit for program activities completed prior to, the date of the current violation. Any person who has previously completed a 12-month or 18-month program licensed pursuant to Section 11836 of the Health and Safety Code shall not be